src/orthography/urucaps.xfscript
# THIS IS INCLUDED IN ALL.FST
# Uru + Cap normalisation
# #

echo <<< defining URUS >>>
define uruB b (->) B || .#. m _ ;
define uruC c (->) C || .#. g _ ;
define uruD d (->) D || .#. n _ ;
define uruF f (->) F || .#. b h _ ;
define uruG g (->) G || .#. n _ ;
define uruP p (->) P || .#. b _ ;
define uruS s (->) S || .#. t _ ;
define uruT t (->) T || .#. d _ ;
 
echo <<< defining VOWELPREFIXESS >>>

! t-aire can be tAire 
! therefore "-a" becomes "A" i.e %- a (->) A

define ntVowel %- a (->) A, %- e (->) E, %- i (->) I, %- o (->) O, %- u (->) U, 
%- á (->) Á, %- é (->) É, %- í (->) Í, %- ó (->) Ó, %- ú (->) Ú || .#. [n|t] _ ;

! can have le hÁine, na hÉireann etc.
define hVowel a (->) A, e (->) E, i (->) I, o (->) O, u (->) U, 
á (->) Á, é (->) É, í (->) Í, ó (->) Ó, ú (->) Ú || .#. h  _ ;

push uruB
push uruC
push uruD
push uruG
push uruF
push uruG
push uruP
push uruS
push uruT
push ntVowel
push hVowel

!! NOW COMPOSED IN LOOKUP.SCRIPT

read regex uruB .o. uruC .o. uruD .o. uruG .o. uruF .o. uruG .o. uruP .o. uruS .o. uruT .o. ntVowel .o. hVowel ;
